lexc/adj/enhuadjing.lexc
LEXICON AddAdjmely
0:^+cMid§oeoebbmely§bb Tocase1mely;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocasemely;

Lexicon Tocasemely
[stem]+Adj:0     Possmely;
[stem]+Adj:0     Plurmely;
[stem]+Adj:0     Fammely;

Lexicon Tocase1mely
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Possmely1;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Plurmely1;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Fammely1;

LEXICON Possmely
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez23§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA22§st§uue2§l  #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor               #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE21§m   Fammely;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE21fazek§m   Fammely;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE21§d   Fammely;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE21fazek§d   Fammely;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE21§   Fammely;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE2§nk   Fammely;    ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE21§t§OEOE25§k   Fammely;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE21fazek§t§OEOE25§k   Fammely;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE21§k   Fammely;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE22§im   Fammely;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE22§id   Fammely;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE22§i   Fammely;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE22§ink   Fammely;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fammely;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE22§ik   Fammely;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fammely;
LEXICON Possmely1
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez23§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA22§st§uue2§l  #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor               #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE21§m   Fammely;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE21fazek§m   Fammely;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE21§d   Fammely;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE21fazek§d   Fammely;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE21§   Fammely;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE2§nk   Fammely;    ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE21§t§OEOE25§k   Fammely;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE21fazek§t§OEOE25§k   Fammely;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE21§k   Fammely;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE22§im   Fammely;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE22§id   Fammely;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE22§i   Fammely;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE22§ink   Fammely;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fammely;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE22§ik   Fammely;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fammely1;


LEXICON Plurmely
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez21§k    Genmely;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez17§k    Genmely;
                            Genmely;

LEXICON Plurmely1
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez21§k    Genmely;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez17§k    Genmely;
                            Genmely1;
        
LEXICON Fammely
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genmely;
                       Genmely;

LEXICON Fammely1
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genmely;
                       Genmely1;

LEXICON Genmely
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Casemely;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casemely;
                       Casemely;
LEXICON Genmely1
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Casemely;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casemely;
                       Casemely1;
 
LEXICON Casemely
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe2§l     #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez24§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA2§l      #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe2§z     #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA2§k       #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§    #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA2§        #;  ! ba, be
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA2§n       #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l    #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA2§        #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig

LEXICON Casemely1
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe2§l     #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez24§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA2§l      #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe2§z     #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA2§k       #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§    #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA2§        #;  ! ba, be
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA2§n       #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l    #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA2§        #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
                          Ikmely;

Lexicon Ikmely
+Ik:^ik     Possikmely;
+Ik:^ik     Plurikmely;
+Ik:^ik     Famikmely;
            #;

LEXICON Possikmely
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez23§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA22§st§uue2§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE21§m   Famikmely;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE21fazek§m   Famikmely;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE21§d   Famikmely;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE21fazek§d   Famikmely;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE21§   Famikmely;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§AE21§   Famikmely;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE2§nk   Famikmely;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE21§t§OEOE25§k   Famikmely;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE21fazek§t§OEOE25§k   Famikmely;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE21§k   Famikmely;   ! ük, uk
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§UUE21§k   Famikmely;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§AE22§im   Famikmely;   ! aim
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE22§im   Famikmely;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§AE22§id   Famikmely;   ! aid
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE22§id   Famikmely;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§AE22§i   Famikmely;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE22§i   Famikmely;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§AE22§ink   Famikmely;   ! aink, eink
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE22§ink   Famikmely;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Famikmely;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Famikmely;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§AE22§ik   Famikmely;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE22§ik   Famikmely;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famikmely;
LEXICON Plurikmely
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez21§k    Genikmely;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez17§k    Genikmely;
                            Genikmely;

LEXICON Famikmely
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genikmely;
                       Genikmely;

LEXICON Genikmely
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseikmely;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseikmely;
                       Caseikmely;
  
LEXICON Caseikmely
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe2§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez24§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA2§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe2§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA2§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe2§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe2§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA2§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA2§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA2§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

LEXICON Adj
additív AddAdjmely;
agresszív AddAdjmely;
anonim AddAdjmely;
argentin AddAdjmely;
attraktív AddAdjmely;
deduktív AddAdjmely;
elektrofil AddAdjmely;
horribilis AddAdjmely;
hídi AddAdjmely;
infantilis AddAdjmely;
inspiratív AddAdjmely;
intuitív AddAdjmely;
kollektív AddAdjmely;
konkrét AddAdjmely;
korporatív AddAdjmely;
kóser AddAdjmely;
mizerábilis AddAdjmely;
norvég AddAdjmely;
objektív AddAdjmely;
obszcén AddAdjmely;
oszét AddAdjmely;
pancser AddAdjmely;
pedofil AddAdjmely;
pisilt AddAdjmely;
portábilis AddAdjmely;
posszibilis AddAdjmely;
pozitív AddAdjmely;
puccinis AddAdjmely;
reduktív AddAdjmely;
rentábilis AddAdjmely;
rossinis AddAdjmely;
stájer AddAdjmely;
szamojéd AddAdjmely;
szanszkrit AddAdjmely;
szeparábilis AddAdjmely;
szingaléz AddAdjmely;
szlovén AddAdjmely;
szoclib AddAdjmely;
szubadditív AddAdjmely;
szubjektív AddAdjmely;
szuggesztív AddAdjmely;
szukcesszív AddAdjmely;
varég AddAdjmely;
álobjektív AddAdjmely;
